Utah statutes.
41-6a-1307.   School bus parking zones -- Establishment -- Uniform markings -- Penalty.

(1)  As used in this section, "school bus parking zone" means a parking space that is clearly identified as reserved for use by a school bus.

(2)  A highway authority for highways under its jurisdiction and school boards for roadways located on school property may establish and locate school bus parking zones in accordance with specifications established under Subsection (3).

(3)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the Department of Transportation, after consultation with local highway authorities and school boards which may include input from school traffic safety committees established under Section 53A-3-402, shall make rules establishing specifications for uniform signage or markings to clearly identify school bus parking zones.

(4)  A person may not stop, stand, or park a vehicle other than a school bus, whether occupied or not, in a clearly identified school bus parking zone.

(5)  A person who violates Subsection (4) shall pay a minimum fine of $75.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

